Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Regulation of Charitable Solicitations
Organizations excepted from application of registration provisions of § 79-11-503 and reporting provisions of this section, see § 79-11-505.

§79-11-509.
Effective date of registration; denial, suspension or revocation of registration or exemption; grounds for denial, suspension or revocation; procedure; violations and penalties; appeal.

The Secretary of State shall deny, suspend or revoke a registration or an exemption for the following reasons:

The application for registration or renewal is incomplete.

The application or renewal fee (where applicable) has not been paid.

A document filed with the Secretary of State contains one or more false or misleading statements or omits material facts.

The charitable contributions have not been or are not being applied for the purpose or purposes stated in the documents filed with the Secretary of State.

The applicant or registrant has violated or failed to comply with any provisions of this chapter or any rule or order thereunder.

Any applicant, registrant, officer, director, or partner of the applicant or registrant, or any agent or employee thereof who has been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor involving misrepresentation, misapplication or misuse of the money or property of another maintains a position where he or she has access to or control over the funds of the charitable organization.

The applicant or registrant has engaged in the use or employment of dishonesty, fraud, deception, misrepresentation, false promise or false pretense.

The applicant or registrant has had the authority to engage in charitable or fund-raising activities denied, revoked or suspended by the Secretary of State or any other state or jurisdiction.

The applicant or registrant has been convicted of any criminal offense committed in connection with the performance of activities regulated under Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any criminal offense involving untruthfulness or dishonesty or any criminal offense relating adversely to the registrant’s or applicant’s fitness to perform activities regulated by Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529. For the purposes of this paragraph, a plea of guilty, non vult, nolo contendere or any other similar disposition of alleged criminal activity shall be deemed a conviction.

Any applicant, registrant, officer, director, or partner of the applicant or registrant, or any agent, volunteer or employee thereof, who has been convicted under federal or state law of any criminal offense involving acts against children maintains a position where he or she is in close contact with children.

Any officer, director, partner, employee, agent or volunteer has accrued three (3) or more unremediated citations issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to this section.

The applicant or registrant has engaged in other forms of misconduct as may be determined by the rules adopted by the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall notify the applicant or licensee of his intent to deny, suspend or revoke a license. The notification shall contain the reasons for the action and shall inform him of his right to request an administrative hearing within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notification. The denial, suspension or revocation shall become effective thirty (30) days after receipt of the notification unless a request for an administrative hearing is received by the Secretary of State before the expiration of the thirty (30) days. If a hearing is requested and the denial, suspension or revocation is upheld, the denial, suspension or revocation shall become effective upon the service of the final administrative decision on the applicant or licensee.

Registration shall become effective no later than noon of the thirtieth day after a completed application is filed, if no denial order is in effect and no proceeding is pending under this chapter. The Secretary of State may, by rule or order, specify an earlier effective date, and the Secretary of State may, by order, defer the effective date until noon of the thirtieth day after the filing of any amendment.

Whenever it appears to the Secretary of State that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, he may, in his discretion, seek one or more of the following remedies in addition to other remedies authorized by law:

Issue a cease and desist order, with or without a prior hearing against the person or persons engaged in the prohibited activities, directing them to cease and desist from further illegal activity;

Administratively dissolve or seek the judicial dissolution of a domestic corporation that is a charitable organization, or revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation that is a charitable organization; or

Issue an order imposing an administrative penalty up to a maximum of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each offense, each violation to be considered as a separate offense in a single proceeding or a series of related proceedings;

For the purpose of determining the amount or extent of a sanction, if any, to be imposed under paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection, the Secretary of State shall consider, among other factors, the frequency, persistence and willfulness of the conduct constituting a violation of this chapter or a rule promulgated thereunder or an order of the Secretary of State, the number of persons adversely affected by the conduct, and the resources of the person committing the violation.

In addition to the above remedies, the Secretary of State may issue a citation to any person engaging in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder. The Secretary of State shall establish rules providing remediation of certain citations, and the decision whether to allow such remediation will be within the Secretary of State’s discretion.

Whenever it appears to the Secretary of State or Attorney General that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any rule or order thereunder, either official may, in his discretion, take any or all of the following actions: bring an action in chancery court to obtain a temporary restraining order or injunction to enjoin the acts or practices and enforce compliance with Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any rule or order thereunder; collect administrative penalties imposed under this section; or obtain on behalf of a charitable organization the return or repayment of any property or consideration received as private inurement or an excess benefit in violation of Section 79-11-519(3)(j). Upon a proper showing a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order or writ of mandamus shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets. In addition, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order of rescission, restitution or disgorgement directed to any person who has engaged in any act constituting a violation of any provision of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any rule or order thereunder. In addition the court may impose a civil penalty up to a maximum of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each offense, and each violation shall be considered as a separate offense in a single proceeding or a series of related proceedings. The court may not require the Secretary of State or Attorney General to post a bond.

Any person aggrieved by a final order of the Secretary of State may obtain a review of the order in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, by filing in the court, within thirty (30) days after the entry of the order, a written petition praying that the order be modified or set aside, in whole or in part. A copy of the petition shall be forthwith served upon the Secretary of State and thereupon the Secretary of State shall certify and file in court a copy of the filing and evidence upon which the order was entered. When these have been filed, the court has exclusive jurisdiction to affirm, modify, enforce or set aside the order, in whole or in part.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 6; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 8; Laws, 2016, ch. 447, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

In 2009, an error in a statutory reference in subsection (4)(d) was corrected at the direction of co-counsel of the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication by substituting “paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection” for “paragraph (b) or (c) of this section.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

The reference in (4)(d) to “paragraph (b) or (c) of this section” has been changed to “paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection” at the direction of the co-counsel of the Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2016 amendment added (7).

Imposition, by Secretary of State, of administrative penalty under this section for failure to file required statements, see § 79-11-507.

§79-11-511.
Out-of-state organization; service of process.

Any charitable organization, person, professional fund-raiser, fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor, which or who solicits contributions in this state, but does not maintain an office within the state, shall be subject to service of process by designating a registered agent upon which process may be served in the State of Mississippi, or if no designation has been made, then service of process shall be upon the Secretary of State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

§79-11-513.
Registration as professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel; bond; filing annual report.

No person shall act as a professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel for a charitable organization before he has registered with the Secretary of State or after the expiration or cancellation of such registration or any renewal thereof. Applications for registration and renewals shall be in writing sworn to under penalties of perjury in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State and accompanied by the filing of a fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00). The professional fund-raiser applicant, at the time of making application, shall file with the State Treasurer and have approved by the Secretary of State a bond in which the applicant shall be the principal obligor in the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) with one or more corporate sureties licensed to do business in this state whose liability in the aggregate will at least equal such sum. The bond shall run to the Secretary of State for the use of the state and to any person who may have a cause of action against the obligor of the bond for any malfeasance or misfeasance in the conduct of such solicitation; provided, that the aggregate limit of liability of the surety to the state and to all such persons shall, in no event, exceed the sum of such bond. Such limitation of liability, as to the sum of the bond, as to the surety, shall not otherwise affect any liability to any person by any charitable organization, professional fund-raiser, professional solicitor or any other person for a violation of this chapter. Registration when effected shall be for a period of one (1) year, or a part thereof, expiring on June 30 or on such other date as prescribed by rule and may be renewed upon written application, under oath, in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State and upon the remittance of the renewal fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and the filing of the bond for additional one-year periods. Every professional fund-raiser and fund-raising counsel required to register pursuant to Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 shall file an annual written report with the Secretary of State containing such information and documentation as he may require by rule.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 7; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 8; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the next-to-last sentence of the section.

Reasons for denial, suspension or revocation of registration or exemption applied for under this section, see § 79-11-509.

Registration as professional solicitor in employ of professional fund-raiser, see § 79-11-517.

§79-11-515.
Contracts; filing with Secretary of State.

All contracts entered into between professional fund-raisers or fund-raising counsel and charitable organizations shall be in writing and a true and correct copy of such contract shall be filed by the professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel who is a party thereto with the Secretary of State at least ten (10) days prior to the performance by the professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel of any service. The contract must be signed by two (2) authorized officials of the charitable organization, one (1) of whom must be a member of the organization’s governing body, and the authorized contracting officer for the professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel. True and correct copies of such contracts shall be kept on file in the offices of the charitable organization and the professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel during the term thereof and until the expiration of a period of three (3) years subsequent to the date the solicitation of contributions provided for therein actually terminates. The contract shall contain all of the following provisions:

The legal name and address of the charitable organization as registered with the Secretary of State, unless that charitable organization is exempt from registration;

A statement of the charitable purpose for which the solicitation campaign is being conducted;

A statement of the respective obligations of the professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel and the charitable organization;

A clear statement of the fees or rate which will be paid to the professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel;

The effective and termination dates of the contract and the date services will commence with respect to the solicitation in this state of contributions for a charitable organization;

For fund-raising counsel, a statement that the fund-raising counsel will not at any time have custody or control of contributions;

A statement that the charitable organization exercises control and approval over the content and volume of any solicitation; and

Any other information required by the rules of the Secretary of State.

Prior to the commencement of any solicitation, the professional fund-raiser shall file all of the following with the Secretary of State and such other information that the Secretary of State may, by rule, require a written report on forms prescribed by the Secretary of State containing information about the solicitation campaign, including, but not limited to, the following:

The fund-raising methods to be used;

The projected dates when the solicitation campaign will commence and terminate;

The location and telephone number from where the solicitation campaign will be conducted if it will be conducted by telephone;

The name and residence address of each person responsible for directing and supervising the conduct of the solicitation campaign;

A statement of whether the professional fund-raiser will at any time have custody of any contributions;

The account number and location of each bank account where receipts from the campaign are to be deposited;

A full and fair description of the charitable program for which the solicitation campaign is being carried out; and

The written and signed consent of every charitable organization on whose behalf the professional fund-raiser will be soliciting contributions or whose name will be mentioned during the solicitation.

Not later than ninety (90) days after a solicitation campaign has been completed and on the anniversary of the commencement of a solicitation campaign lasting more than one (1) year, the professional fund-raiser shall furnish an accounting of all contributions collected and expenses paid to the charitable organization with which the professional fund-raiser has contracted. The accounting shall be in writing and shall be retained by the professional fund-raiser and charitable organization for three (3) years. The professional fund-raiser shall file a final report of the accounting with the Secretary of State on forms prescribed by him and containing such information he may, by rule, require not later than seven (7) days after it is furnished to the charitable organization. This report shall be signed by the contracting agent with the professional fund-raiser and also by an authorized officer of the charitable organization.

Not later than two (2) days after receipt of each contribution, the professional fund-raiser shall deposit the entire amount of the contribution in an account at a bank or other federally insured financial institution which shall be in the name of the charitable organization with which the professional fund-raiser has contracted. Each contribution collected by the professional fund-raiser shall be solely in the name of that charitable organization. The charitable organization shall have sole control of all withdrawals from the account and the professional fund-raiser shall not be given the authority to withdraw any deposited funds from the account.

During each solicitation campaign and for not less than three (3) years after its completion, the professional fund-raiser shall maintain the following records that shall be made available to the Attorney General or the Secretary of State upon request:

A record of each contribution that at any time is in the custody of the professional fund-raiser, including the name and address of each contributor and the date and amount of the contribution; and

The location of each bank or financial institution in which the professional fund-raiser has deposited revenue from the solicitation campaign and the account number of each account into which the deposits were made.

Any material change in any information filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to this section shall be reported in writing by the professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel to the Secretary of State not more than seven (7) days after such change occurs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

§79-11-517.
Registration as professional solicitor in employ of professional fund-raiser.

No person shall act as a professional solicitor in the employ of a professional fund-raiser required to register pursuant to Section 79-11-513 before he has registered with the Secretary of State or after the expiration or cancellation of such registration or any renewal thereof. Application for registration or renewal shall be in writing sworn to under penalties of perjury in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State. Such registration when effected shall be for a period of one (l) year, or a part thereof, expiring on June 30 or such other date as prescribed by rule, and may be renewed upon written application, sworn to under penalties of perjury, in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State for additional one-year periods.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 9; reenacted, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 9; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 10; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the last sentence.

Reasons for denial, suspension or revocation of registration or exemption applied for under this section, see § 79-11-509.

§79-11-518.
Records of solicitation activities.

Every charitable organization, professional fund-raiser, professional solicitor, or fund-raising counsel, whether or not required to register pursuant to Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall keep true and correct books and records of solicitation activities that are covered by Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529, Mississippi Code of 1972, or any rule or order adopted under Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529, Mississippi Code of 1972. All such books and records shall be open to inspection at all reasonable times by the Secretary of State or the Attorney General, or their duly authorized representatives. The records shall be retained for a period of at least three (3) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities § 162 et seq.

§79-11-519.
Powers and duties of district attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys; violations of Sections79-11-501 through79-11-529.

It is the duty of the district attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys of this state to prosecute all violations of the provisions of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529. In addition, actions for violations of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 may be prosecuted by the Attorney General.

Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 shall not be construed to limit or restrict the exercise of the powers or the performance of the duties of the Attorney General which he otherwise is authorized to exercise or perform under any other provision of law by statute or otherwise except the rendering of interpretative opinions in accordance with Section 79-11-503 which shall be limited to the Secretary of State.

It shall be a violation of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 for any person:

To misrepresent:

The purpose or beneficiary of a solicitation;

The purpose or nature of a charitable organization; or

That any other person sponsors or endorses a solicitation.

To use or exploit the fact of registration so as to lead the public to believe that such registration constitutes an endorsement or approval by the state;

To use the name of a charitable organization, or to display any emblem, device or printed matter belonging to or associated with a charitable organization without the express written permission of the charitable organization;

To make any false or misleading statement on any document required by Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any rule or order thereunder;

To fail to comply with the requirements of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any rule or order thereunder;

To commit any unfair or deceptive act or practice; to employ any device, scheme or artifice to defraud; to engage in any act, practice or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person; or to obtain money or property by means of any false pretense, representation or promise;

To fail to provide complete and timely payment to a charitable organization of the proceeds from a solicitation campaign or a charitable sales promotion;

To make any false or misleading statements in the solicitations of contributions in this state or to omit to state any fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading;

To refuse or fail, after notice, to produce any records required to be kept under Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529, or any rule or order promulgated thereunder;

To benefit, directly or indirectly, from any transaction in which an economic benefit is provided by a charitable organization where the value of the benefit provided by the organization exceeds the fair market value of the consideration received by the organization.

It shall be a violation of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 for any charitable organization:

To engage in any financial transaction which is not related to the accomplishment of a charitable purpose, or which jeopardizes or interferes with the ability of the charitable organization to accomplish a charitable purpose;

To expend an unreasonable amount of money for solicitation or management;

To use the name which is the same as or confusingly similar to the name of another charitable organization unless the latter organization shall consent in writing to its use;

To represent itself as being associated with another charitable organization without the express written acknowledgment and endorsement of such other charitable organization;

To use the services of an unregistered professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor;

To fail to comply with any provisions of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any rule or order thereunder;

To employ as an officer, director, partner, employee, agent or volunteer, any person who has accrued three (3) or more unremediated citations issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 79-11-509;

To employ as an officer, director, partner, employee or agent any person who has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor involving misrepresentation, misapplication or misuse of the money or property of another, in a capacity where that person has access to or control over the funds of the charitable organization;

To employ as an officer, director, partner, employee, volunteer or agent any person who has been convicted under federal or state law of any criminal offense involving acts against children, where such position will bring the person into close contact with children; or

To apply the charitable organization’s funds or assets for private inurement or excess benefits which exceed the fair market value of the property or services received in return from directors, officers, or those persons who are deemed disqualified persons or insiders under applicable federal law for tax-exempt organizations.

It shall be a violation of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 for any professional fund-raiser, professional fund-raising counsel or any professional solicitor:

To perform any services on behalf of an unregistered charitable organization; or

To fail to comply with any provisions of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any rule or order thereunder.

It shall be a violation of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 for any person, in connection with a public safety organization solicitation:

To use any representation that implies that the contribution is for or on behalf of a public safety agency or a public safety organization, or using any emblem, device, or printed matter belonging to or associated with a public safety agency or organization, unless authorized in writing to do so by the agency or organization;

To use a name, symbol, or statement that is similar to that used by a public safety agency or organization in a manner that is intended to confuse or mislead a person being solicited;

To represent or imply that the solicitor is a peace officer or member of a public safety agency or public safety organization if the solicitor is not;

To solicit for a public safety organization, independent promoter, public safety publication, or cause by representing that those who respond affirmatively to the solicitation will receive favored treatment by public safety personnel; or

To fail to comply with any provisions of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any rule or order thereunder.

A misrepresentation may be accomplished by words or conduct or failure to disclose a material fact. Regardless of a person’s intent or the lack of injury, the above acts and practices are prohibited in the planning, conduct or execution of any solicitation or charitable sales promotion.

The Secretary of State or the Attorney General may exercise the authority granted in this section against any charitable organization or person which or who operates under the guise or pretense of being an organization exempted by the provisions of Section 79-11-505, and is not in fact an organization entitled to such an exemption.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 10; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 10; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 12; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsection (6) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “(b) To use a name...” for “(b) Using a name...,”
“(c) To represent or imply...” for “(c) Representing or implying...” and “(d) To solicit...” for “(d) Soliciting...” The corrections were ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

Fines and penalties for violations of §§ 79-11-501 through 79-11-527, see § 79-11-529.

§79-11-521.
Investigations of violations; written statements as to facts and circumstances; publication of information concerning violations; authority to administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, take evidence, require production of books, papers, etc.

Either the Secretary of State or Attorney General, in his discretion: (a) may make such public or private investigations within or outside of this state as deemed necessary by the Secretary of State or Attorney General to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, or to aid in the enforcement of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or in the prescribing of rules and forms hereunder; (b) may require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated; and (c) may publish information concerning any violation of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or any rule or order hereunder.

For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529, the Secretary of State or Attorney General, or any designated officer may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the Secretary of State or Attorney General deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 11; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 11; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 13; Laws, 2009, ch. 547, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

§79-11-523.
Use of names, symbol or statement during solicitations for contributions; disclosure requirements for professional fund raisers.

Prior to orally requesting a contribution or contemporaneously with written requests for a contribution, a professional fund-raiser and professional solicitor shall be responsible for clearly and conspicuously disclosing:

The name of the professional fund-raiser as on file with the Secretary of State and that the solicitation is being conducted by a professional fund-raiser who is being paid for his services;

If the professional solicitor acting on behalf of the professional fund-raiser identifies himself by name, the professional solicitor’s legal name; and

The name of the charitable organization as on file with the Secretary of State and a description of how the contributions raised by the solicitation will be utilized for a charitable purpose or, if no charitable organization exists, a description as to how the contributions raised by the solicitation will be utilized for a charitable purpose.

All responses given by a professional fund-raiser and professional solicitor to an oral or written request for information shall be truthful.

In the case of a solicitation campaign conducted orally, whether by telephone or otherwise, any written confirmation, receipt or reminder sent to any person who has contributed or has pledged to contribute shall include a clear and conspicuous disclosure of the information required under paragraph (1)(a) of this section.

If requested by the person being solicited, the professional fund-raiser and professional solicitor shall inform that person orally and then in writing within fourteen (14) days of the request of the fixed percentage of the gross revenue or the reasonable estimate of the percentage of the gross revenue that the charitable organization or sponsor will receive as benefit from the solicitation campaign.

In addition to the information required by subsection (1), any written confirmation, receipt and reminder of a contribution made pursuant to an oral solicitation and any written solicitation shall conspicuously state verbatim:

The official registration and financial information of (insert the legal name of the charity as registered with the Secretary of State) may be obtained from the Mississippi Secretary of State’s office by calling 1-888-236-6167. Registration by the Secretary of State does not imply endorsement by the Secretary of State.

Prior to orally requesting or contemporaneously with written requests for advertising to appear in a for-profit publication which relates to, purports to relate to or which could reasonably be construed to relate to any charitable purpose, the professional fund-raiser or fund-raising counsel shall be responsible for clearly and conspicuously disclosing:

That the publication is a for-profit, commercial enterprise;

The true name of the solicitor and the fact that the solicitor is being paid for his services; and

The publication is not directly affiliated or sponsored by any charitable organization.

Every container, as defined in Section 79-11-501, shall have a printed or typed notice affixed to the container, in a conspicuous place and accessible to the public, that is easily readable and legible that informs the public of the following:

The approximate annual percentage paid, if any, to any person to maintain, service or collect the contributions raised by the solicitation;

The net percentage or sum annually paid for the most recent calendar year paid to the specific charitable purpose; and

If the maintenance, service and collection from the container is done by volunteers or by paid individuals.

The disclosure as required in this provision shall not apply to persons requesting any contributions for the relief or benefit of any individual, specified by name at the time of the solicitation, if all of the contributions collected are turned over to the named beneficiary, and provided all fund-raising functions are carried on by persons who are unpaid, directly or indirectly, for such services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 12; reenacted, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 12; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection, or use of membership list. 37 A.L.R.4th 1206.

§79-11-524.
Restrictions on hours of telephone solicitation.

Any fund-raising counsel, professional fund-raiser, professional solicitor or employee of any of these who makes a telephone solicitation subject to the provisions of this chapter to a residential telephone number shall make calls only between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m., Monday through Saturday. No calls shall be made on Sundays.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Validity, construction, and application of state statute or law pertaining to telephone solicitation. 44 A.L.R.5th 619.

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities § 162 et seq.

§79-11-525.
Fiduciary responsibility of person soliciting, collecting, or expending contributions.

Every person who solicits, collects or expends contributions on behalf of a charitable organization or for a charitable purpose, or who conducts a charitable sales promotion, and every officer, director, trustee or employee of that person who is concerned with the solicitation, collection or expenditure of those contributions shall be considered a fiduciary and as acting in a fiduciary capacity. This section does not supersede or otherwise alter the standard of care or the limitations on the liability of volunteers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 13; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 13; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1997.